Hawaii, session 2025, GM1216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 480J-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "installment lender" or
"lender" to read as follows:
""Installment lender" or "lender" means any person not
exempt under section 480J-32 who is in the business of offering
or making [a consumer] an installment loan, who arranges [a-
c-enoumef] an installment loan for a third party [—] required by
this chapter to be licensed, or who acts as an agent for a third
party [,regardloso of whether the third party is exempt from
licensure under this chapter or whetho-r-approval,—acceptance,—
ratificat-i-en- by^ho third party is nocossary to create a legal
obligation for-4?hc third party-] required by this chapter to be
licensed with respect to the third party's offering, making, or
arranging of installment loans, through any method including
mail, telephone, the Internet, or any electronic means."
SECTION 2. Section 480J-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
2025-2850 SB1367 CDl SMA-2.docx

Page 2
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
1. By amending subsection (a) to read:
"(a) Each installment loan transaction and renewal shall
meet the following requirements:
(1) Any transaction and renewal shall be documented in a
written agreement pursuant to section 480J-3;
(2) The total amount of the installment loan shall not be
greater than $1,500 pursuant to section 480J-5(a);
(3) The total amount of loan charges an installment lender
may charge, collect, or receive in connection with an
installment loan shall not exceed fifty per cent of
the principal loan amount;
(4) Subject to paragraph (3), a monthly maintenance fee
may be charged by the lender[—]; provided that thirty
days shall equal one month and for any fraction of a
month the fee shall be prorated on a daily basis not
to exceed the following:
(A) $25 monthly fee on a loan of an original
principal loan amount up to $299.99; provided
further that a fraction of a month shall use a
daily factor of 83 cents per day;
2025-2850 SB1367 CDl SMA-2.docx 2
■IIIMillHIHIIIHIIIIIIIIH

Page 3
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
CD. 1
(B) $30 monthly fee on a loan of an original
principal loan amount of at least $300 and up to
$699.99; provided further that a fraction of a
month shall use a daily factor of $1 per day; and
(C) $35 monthly fee on a loan of an original
principal loan amount of at least $700 and
greater; provided further that a fraction of a
month shall use a daily factor of $1.17 per day;
provided further that the monthly maintenance fee
shall not be added to the loan balance upon which the
interest is charged; provided further that an
installment lender shall not charge, collect, or
receive a monthly maintenance fee if the borrower is a
person on active duty in the armed forces of the
United States or a dependent of that person;
(5) The minimum contracted repayment term of the
installment loan shall be two months if the contracted
loan amount is $500 or less, or four months if the
contracted loan amount is $500.01 or more; provided
that, for purposes of meeting the reguired minimum
2025-2850 SB1367 CDl SMA-2.docx

Page 4
S.B, NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
contracted repayment term, an installment lender may
calculate one month as twenty-eight days or longer;
(6) All repayment schedule due dates shall be dates upon
which an installment lender is open for business to
the public at the place of business where the
installment loan was made;
(7) An installment lender shall accept prepayment in full
or in part from a consumer prior to the loan due date
and shall not charge the consumer a fee or penalty if
the consumer opts to prepay the loan; provided that to
make a prepayment, all past due interest and fees
shall be paid first;
(8) The loan amount shall be fully amortized over the term
of the loan, and maintenance fees shall be applied in
arrears on a monthly basis;
(9) A consumer's repayment obligations shall not be
secured by a lien on any real or personal property;
(10) An installment lender may offer to a consumer the
option to make a payment through the consumer's debit
card and may charge not more than a $1 convenience
fee; provided that the installment lender shall be
2025-2850 SB1367 CDl SMA-2.docx

Page 5
S B. NO.
C.D. 1
prohibited from requiring this form of payment. The
form of payment decision shall rest with the consumer.
The installment lender shall not charge the consumer a
non-sufficient funds fee for rejected payments through
the use of the consumer's debit card. This $1
convenience fee shall not be considered loan charges.
[-H^] (11) An installment lender shall not charge a
consumer any loan charges for an installment loan,
other than the fees permitted by this chapter;
(12) The written agreement required under section
480J-3 shall not require a consumer to purchase add-on
products, such as credit insurance; and
[■■(12) ] (13) The maximum contracted repayment term of the
installment loan shall be twelve months."
2. By amending subsection (c) to read:
"(c) For each cash or in-person payment made by a
consumer, a lender shall give the consumer a written receipt
with the lender's name and address, payment date, amount paid,
[consumer's name,] and sufficient information to identify the
account to which the payment is applied."
2025-2850 SB1367 CDl SMA-2.docx 5

Page 6
S B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 3. Section 480J-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-{•] §480J-5 [^] Maximum loan amount; prohibition against
multiple loans. (a) A lender shall not lend an amount greater
than $1,500 nor shall the amount financed exceed $1,500 by any
one lender at any time to a consumer.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in section 480J-8, an
installment lender shall take reasonable measures to ensure that
no consumer has more than one installment loan outstanding at a
time from any of the following:
(1) The installment lender;
(2) A person related to the installment lender by common
ownership or control;
(3) A person in whom the installment lender has any
financial interest of ten per cent or more; or
(4) Any employee or agent of the installment lender.
(c) An installment lender that receives written or
electronic confirmation from each consumer that the consumer
does not have any outstanding installment loans from the
entities listed in subsection (b) as of the date the consumer
2025-2850 SB1367 CDl SMA-2.docx 6
■iigiiMiiBiiiiiniiBH

Page 7
SB. NO. S’;
C.D. 1
enters into an installment loan with the installment lender
shall be deemed to have met the requirements of this section.
(d) If a consumer's spouse obtains an installment loan
voluntarily and separately from the consumer, and subsequently
the consumer obtains an installment loan voluntarily and
separately from the consumer's spouse, where neither the
consumer nor the consumer's spouse are coborrowers with each
other on either loan, and the consumer's action is documented in
writing, either in the written agreement required under section
480J-3 or in a subsequent agreement, signed by the consumer, and
retained by the lender, the secondary transaction shall not be
considered a violation of this section.
[-(e4-- Upon a conoumor's payment--in-■ full of any installment
loan,—an installment lender shall wait a period of th-reo days
before the lender may make another installment—-loan to the same
consume-r-. ] "
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025;
provided that this Act shall be repealed on June 30, 2030, and
sections 480J-2 and 480J-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and the
2025-2850 SB1367 CDl SMA-2.docx 7

Page 8
S.B. NO. S';
C.D. 1
definition of "installment lender" or "lender" in section
480J-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form
in which they read on the day prior to the effective date of
this Act.
2025-2850 SB1367 CDl SMA-2.docx 8

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 29th May . 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 1367, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
President of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate
148

SB No. 1367, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives